Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,154
Deficiency in net worth; impaired condition; director; powers.

(1) Whenever the director finds that the net worth maintained by any health maintenance organization is less than the minimum net worth required to be maintained by section 44-32,138, he or she shall give written notice to the health maintenance organization of the amount of the deficiency and require (a) filing of a plan for correction of the deficiency acceptable to the director and (b) correction of the deficiency within a reasonable time, not to exceed sixty days, unless an extension of time, not to exceed sixty additional days, is granted by the director. Such a deficiency shall be an impairment, and failure to correct the impairment in the prescribed time shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of the certificate of authority or for placing the health maintenance organization in supervision, rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation.

(2) Unless allowed by the director, no health maintenance organization or person acting on its behalf may, directly or indirectly, renew, issue, or deliver any certificate, agreement, or contract of coverage in this state for which a premium is charged or collected when the health maintenance organization writing such coverage is impaired and the impairment is known to the health maintenance organization or such person. The existence of an impairment shall not prevent the issuance or renewal of a certificate, agreement, or contract when the enrollee exercises an option granted under the plan to obtain a new, renewed, or converted coverage.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 63.